04_Morphology/kor.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<pref%>            ! Prefix
%<n%>               ! Noun 
%<gen%>             ! Genetive
%>                  ! Morpheme boundary

LEXICON Root

Prefix1 ;
Prefix2 ;
Prefix3 ;
Prefix4 ;

LEXICON Prefix1

맨%>:%<pref%> Noun1 ; ! "bare" ;

LEXICON Noun1

얼굴:%<n%> CASE ; ! "a face" ;
손:%<n%> CASE ; ! "a hand"
발:%<n%> CASE ; ! "a foot"
몸:%<n%> CASE ; ! "a body"
정신:%<n%> CASE ; ! "mind"

LEXICON Prefix2

신%>:%<pref%> Noun2 ; ! "new"

LEXICON Noun2

여성:%<n%> CASE ; ! "a woman"
남성:%<n%> CASE ; ! "a man"
제품:%<n%> CASE ; ! "a product"
유행:%<n%> CASE ; ! "a trend"
세대:%<n%> CASE ; ! "a generation"

LEXICON Prefix3

풋%>:%<pref%> Noun3 ; ! "young"

LEXICON Noun3

사과:%<n%> CASE ; ! "an apple"
고추:%<n%> CASE ; ! "a man"
감자:%<n%> CASE ; ! "a potato"
배:%<n%> CASE ; ! "a pear"
김치:%<n%> CASE ; ! "kimchi"

LEXICON Prefix4

초%>:%<pref%> Noun4 ; ! "early"
늦%>:%<pref%> Noun4 ; ! "late"

LEXICON Noun4

봄:%<n%> CASE ; ! "spring"
여름:%<n%> CASE ; ! "summer"
가을:%<n%> CASE ; ! "autumn"
겨울:%<n%> CASE ; ! "winter"
저녁:%<n%> CASE ; ! "evening"

LEXICON CASE

%>의:%<gen%> # ; ! "of" ;
# ;
